src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/numerals_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Numerals.

Tests:
  Num - akta: # 
    akta+Num+Sg+Nom: akta
    akta+Num+Sg+Ela: [avtas, åvtås]
    akta+Num+Sg+Ill: aktaj
    akta+Num+Sg+Par: [avtat, åvtåt]
    akta+Num+Sg+Ine: [avtan, åvtån]
    akta+Num+Pl+Ill: [avtajda, åvtåjda]
    akta+Num+Pl+Ela: [avtajs, åvtåjs]
    akta+Num+Ess: aktan
    akta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: akti

  Noun - guokta: #GUOKTA
    guokta+Num+Sg+Nom: guokta
    guokta+Num+Sg+Gen: guovte
    guokta+Num+Sg+Acc: [guokta, guovtev]
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ill: guoktaj
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr: guovte
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ine: guovten
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ela: guovtes
    guokta+Num+Sg+Com: guovtijn
    guokta+Num+Ess: guoktan
    guokta+Num+Pl+Nom: guovte
    guokta+Num+Pl+Acc: guovtijt
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ill: guovtijda
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ine: guovtijn
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ela: guovtijs
    guokta+Num+Pl+Com: guovtij
    guokta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: guokti

  Noun - gålmmå: #GÅLMMÅ
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Gen: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Acc: [gålmmå, gålmåv]
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ill: gålmmåj
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ine: gålmån
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ela: gålmås
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Com: gålmåjn
    gålmmå+Num+Ess: gålmmån
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Nom: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Acc: gålmåjt
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ill: gålmåjda
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ine: gålmåjn
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ela: gålmåjs
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Com: gålmåj
    gålmmå+Num+Der/akti+Adv: gålmmi

  Num - giehtja: # 
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Nom: [giehtja, gietjav]
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ela: gietjas
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ill: giehtjaj
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Par: gietjat
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ine: gietjan
    giehtja+Num+Pl+Ill: gietjajda
    giehtja+Num+Pl+Ela: gietjajs
    giehtja+Num+Ess: giehtjan
    giehtja+Num+Der/akti+Adv: giehttji
    


  Num - lågenanguokta: # MUORRA
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Nom: lågenanguokta    
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Gen: lågenanguovte
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Acc: [lågenanguovtev, lågenanguokta]
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ine: lågenanguovten
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ela: lågenanguovtes
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ill: lågenanguoktaj
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Com: lågenanguovtijn
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Par: lågenanguovtet
    lågenanguokta+Num+Pl+Ill: lågenanguovtijda
    lågenanguokta+Num+Pl+Ela: lågenanguovtijs
    lågenanguokta+Num+Ess: lågenanguoktan
    lågenanguokta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: lågenanguokti
 
 
  Num - vihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: vihttalåkvihtta
    
  Num - tjuohtegålmmå: # 
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohtegålmmå    

  Num - tjuohteguhttalåhkeakta: # 
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohteguhttalåkakta    

  Num - tjuohtelågenangålmmå: # 
    tjuohtelågenangålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohtelågenangålmmå  

  Num - gáktsatjuohte: # 
    gáktsatjuohte+Num+Pl+Nom: gáktsatjuode 

  Num - gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvihtta

  Num - tuvsán: # 
    tuvsán+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsán  

  Num - tuvsánlågenanaktse: # 
    tuvsánlågenanaktse+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánlågenanaktse  

  Num - tuvsántjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå: # 
    tuvsántjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsántjuohtenielljalåkgålmmå  

  Num - tuvsánaktatjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå: # 
    tuvsánaktatjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánaktatjuohtenielljalåkgålmmå  

  Num - aktatuvsántjuohtenielljalåhkevihtta: # 
    aktatuvsántjuohtenielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: aktatuvsántjuohtenielljalåkvihtta

  Num - tuvsánvihttatjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå: # 
    tuvsánvihttatjuohtenielljalåhkegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánvihttatjuodenielljalåkgålmmå  
 
  Num - guhttatuvsán: # 
    guhttatuvsán+Num+Pl+Nom: guhttatuvsána  
 
  Num - gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkegålmmå: # 
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeaktselåkgålmmå

  Num - gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta: # 
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Nom: gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkakta
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Ela: [gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkavtas, gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkåvtås]
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Ill: gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkaktaj
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Par: [gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkavtat, gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkåvtåt]
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Ine: [gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkavtan, gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkåvtån]
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Pl+Ill: [gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkavtajda, gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkåvtåjda]
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Pl+Ela: [gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkavtajs, gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkåvtåjs]
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Ess: gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkaktan
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: gáktsalåktuvsánaguhttalåkakti

  Num - tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkvihtta

  Num - guhttatjuohtenielljalåhkevihttatuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkeaktse: # 
    guhttatjuohtenielljalåhkevihttatuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Nom: guhttatjuodenielljalåkvihttatuvsánavihttatjuodeaktselåkaktse

  Num - guhttatjuohtenielljalåhkevihttatuvsánjuohteaktselåhkeaktse: # 
    guhttatjuohtenielljalåhkevihttatuvsántjuohteaktselåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Nom: guhttatjuodenielljalåkvihttatuvsánatjuohteaktselåkaktse

  Num - lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguhtta: # 
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Nom: lågenangáktsatuvsánaaktatjuohtegålmmålåkguhtta




  Num - vihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: vihttalåkvihtta
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Gen: vihttalåkvidá
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Acc: vihttalåkvidáv
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ine: vihttalåkvidán
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ela: vihttalåkvidás
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ill: vihttalåkvihttaj
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Par: vihttalåkvidát
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Com: vihttalåkvidájn
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Acc: vihttalåkvidájt
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ill: vihttalåkvidájda
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ela: vihttalåkvidájs
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Ess: vihttalåkvihttan
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: vihttalåkvihtti

  Num - guoktalåkniellja: # MUORRA
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Sg+Nom: guoktalåkniellja
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Sg+Ela: guoktalåknieljes
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Sg+Ill: [guoktalåknælljáj, guoktalåknälljáj]
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Sg+Par: guoktalåknieljet
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Sg+Ine: guoktalåknieljen
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Pl+Ill: guoktalåknieljijda
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Pl+Ela: guoktalåknieljijs
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Ess: guoktalåknielljan
    guoktalåhkeniellja+Num+Der/akti+Adv: guoktalåkniellji

  Num - nielljalåkvihtta: # 
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: nielljalåkvihtta
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Gen: nielljalåkvidá
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Acc: nielljalåkvidáv
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ine: nielljalåkvidán
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ela: nielljalåkvidás
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ill: nielljalåkvihttaj
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Par: nielljalåkvidát
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Com: nielljalåkvidájn
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Nom: nielljalåkvidá
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Acc: nielljalåkvidájt
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ill: nielljalåkvidájda
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ela: nielljalåkvidájs
    nielljalåhkevihtta+Num+Ess: nielljalåkvihttan
    

  Num - gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvihtta
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Gen: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidá
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Acc: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidáv
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ine: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidán
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ela: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidás
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Ill: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvihttaj
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Par: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidát
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Com: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidájn
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Acc: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidájt
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ill: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidájda
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Pl+Ela: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvidájs
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Ess: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvihttan
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: gålmmåtjuodevihttalåkvihtti

  Num - gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse: # 
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkaktse
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Ela: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkavtses
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Ill: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkaktsáj 
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Par: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkavtset
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Sg+Ine: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkavtsen
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Pl+Ill: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkavtsijda
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Pl+Ela: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkavtsijs
    gålmmåtjuohtegáktsalåhkeaktse+Num+Ess: gålmmåtjuodegáktsalåkaktsen

  Num - tjuohtegålmmå: # 
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohtegålmmå
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Ela: tjuohtegålmås
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Ill: tjuohtegålmmåj
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Par: tjuohtegålmåt
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Ine: tjuohtegålmån
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Pl+Ill: tjuohtegålmåjda
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Pl+Ela: tjuohtegålmåjs
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Ess: tjuohtegålmmån

  Num - tjuohteguhttalåkguhtta: # 
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohteguhttalåkguhtta
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Ela: tjuohteguhttalåkgudás
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Ill: tjuohteguhttalåkguhttaj
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Par: tjuohteguhttalåkgudát
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Ine: tjuohteguhttalåkgudán
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Com: tjuohteguhttalåkgudájn
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Pl+Ill: tjuohteguhttalåkgudájda
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Pl+Ela: tjuohteguhttalåkgudájs
    tjuohteguhttalåhkeguhtta+Num+Ess: tjuohteguhttalåkguhttan

  Num - tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguokta: # 
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguokta
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ela: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovtes
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ill: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguoktaj
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Par: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovtet
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Ine: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovten
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Sg+Com: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovtijn
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Pl+Ill: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovtijda
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Pl+Ela: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguovtijs
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkeguokta+Num+Ess: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåkguoktan

  Num - gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse: # 
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeaktse
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Sg+Ela: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeavtses
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Sg+Ill: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeaktsáj
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Sg+Par: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeavtset
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Sg+Ine: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeavtsen
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Pl+Ill: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeavtsijda
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Pl+Ela: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeavtsijs
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktse+Num+Ess: gålmmåtuvsánavihttatjuodeaktsen
